apertium-tg-fa.fa.dix
    <pardef n="/VERBS_vowel">

                              <e>
        <i/>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;/&#x646;__vblex"/>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <par n="P__&#x646;"/>
        <par n="P__jnjprefixes"/>
        <i/>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;/&#x646;__vblex"/>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <par n="P__jjprefixes"/>
        <i/>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;/&#x646;__vblex"/>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <i/>
        <p>
          <l>ه</l>
          <r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="zwnj_or_space"/>
        <par n="aV__/&#x627;&#x633;&#x62A;&#x646;__vbser"/>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <par n="P__&#x646;"/>
        <par n="P__jnjprefixes"/>
        <i/>
        <p>
          <l>ه</l>
          <r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="zwnj_or_space"/>
        <par n="aV__/&#x627;&#x633;&#x62A;&#x646;__vbser"/>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <par n="P__jjprefixes"/>
        <i/>
        <p>
          <l>ه</l>
          <r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="zwnj_or_space"/>
        <par n="aV__/&#x627;&#x633;&#x62A;&#x646;__vbser"/>
      </e>

      
                              <e>
        <i/>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <par n="Pjj__imp__prefixes"/>
        <i/>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <i/>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__/&#x628;&#x686;&#x634;[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <par n="Pjj__imp__prefixes"/>
        <i/>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__/&#x628;&#x686;&#x634;[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>

      
                              <e>
        <i/>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <par n="P__&#x646;"/>
        <par n="P__jnjprefixes"/>
        <i/>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>

                              <e>
        <par n="P__jjprefixes"/>
        <i/>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>

    </pardef>



  
<pardef n="/VERBS_vowel__&#x646;&#x62F;&#x648;&#x62E;&#x62A;&#x646;">
                        <e>
        <i>ا</i>
        <p>
          <l>ندوختن</l>
          <r>اندوختنن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;/&#x646;__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__&#x646;"/>
        <par n="P__jnjprefixes"/>
        <i>ا</i>
        <p>
          <l>ندوختن</l>
          <r>اندوختنن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;/&#x646;__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__jjprefixes"/>
        <i>یا</i>
        <p>
          <l>ندوختن</l>
          <r>اندوختنن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;/&#x646;__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <i>ا</i>
        <p>
          <l>ندوختنه</l>
          <r>اندوختنن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="zwnj_or_space"/>
        <par n="aV__/&#x627;&#x633;&#x62A;&#x646;__vbser"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__&#x646;"/>
        <par n="P__jnjprefixes"/>
        <i>ا</i>
        <p>
          <l>ندوختنه</l>
          <r>اندوختنن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="zwnj_or_space"/>
        <par n="aV__/&#x627;&#x633;&#x62A;&#x646;__vbser"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__jjprefixes"/>
        <i>یا</i>
        <p>
          <l>ندوختنه</l>
          <r>اندوختنن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="zwnj_or_space"/>
        <par n="aV__/&#x627;&#x633;&#x62A;&#x646;__vbser"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <i>ا</i>
        <p>
          <l>ندوز</l>
          <r>اندوختنن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="Pjj__imp__prefixes"/>
        <i>یا</i>
        <p>
          <l>ندوز</l>
          <r>اندوختنن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <i>ا</i>
        <p>
          <l>ندوز</l>
          <r>اندوختنن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__/&#x628;&#x686;&#x634;[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="Pjj__imp__prefixes"/>
        <i>یا</i>
        <p>
          <l>ندوز</l>
          <r>اندوختنن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__/&#x628;&#x686;&#x634;[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <i>ا</i>
        <p>
          <l>ندوز</l>
          <r>اندوختنن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__&#x646;"/>
        <par n="P__jnjprefixes"/>
        <i>ا</i>
        <p>
          <l>ندوز</l>
          <r>اندوختنن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__jjprefixes"/>
        <i>یا</i>
        <p>
          <l>ندوز</l>
          <r>اندوختنن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>

</pardef>

                            <e lm="&#x627;&#x646;&#x62F;&#x648;&#x62E;&#x62A;&#x646;"><i/><par n="/VERBS_vowel__&#x646;&#x62F;&#x648;&#x62E;&#x62A;&#x646;"/></e>
